Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-2,129
District or company; transfer of appropriation for agricultural purposes; hearing; notice; powers and duties; priority date.

(1) The board of directors of the district or company, or the board's designee, may hold a hearing on a proposed transfer under section 46-2,127 and shall hold a hearing if requested by any owner of land within the district or served by the canal company. Notice of a hearing under this subsection shall be published at least seven calendar days prior to the hearing in at least one newspaper of general circulation in each county containing lands upon which the water appropriation is or is proposed to be applied. If the hearing is held by the board's designee, the board's designee shall make a written recommendation to the board within fifteen calendar days after the hearing. The board shall act upon the proposed transfer at the board's next regular or special meeting following receipt of the designee's recommendation.

(2) The board of directors may transfer the water appropriation at a regular or special meeting.

(3) Any water appropriation transferred to a tract of land under section 46-2,127 shall retain the original priority date for the water appropriation.

(4) All transfers shall be reported annually to the department pursuant to section 46-261.

Laws 1995, LB 99, § 10.